Hawaii statutes.
§88-337 Service-connected disability
retirement allowance. Upon retirement for service-connected disability, a
class H member shall receive the amount of the member's accumulated
contributions and a maximum retirement allowance of thirty-five per cent of the
member's average final compensation. [L 2004, c 179, pt of §1; am L 2005, c 58,
§29]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next